North Carolina, session 2025, HB55.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. These funds shall be allocated to The
Autism Society of North Carolina, a nonprofit corporation, to support its IGNITE Program,
which offers activities and education groups which foster independence and social interaction for
young adults with autism transitioning into adulthood.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H55-v-1*